Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $9,850,229,757 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$625,259,443 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$44,328,098 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from fees,  moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds de-
scribed in section  4 of this 2025 Act, collected or received by the department for the State
School Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$839,625,392 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from fees,  moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the department for the State  School Fund from the Fund for Student Success
established under ORS 327.001.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning  July
1, 2025, the Department of Education:
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the State School  Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to $1,600,000 from the  State School Fund for purposes related to Oregon
Digital Learning.
SECTION 6. (1) Notwithstanding and in lieu of the  transfer required under ORS 327.008
(11), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the Department of Education shall  transfer
$30,807,937 from the State  School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under
ORS 342.953.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 1
(2) For the purpose of making the transfer under this section:
(a) The total amount available for  all distributions from the State School Fund shall be
reduced by $6,794,711;
(b) The amount distributed to school districts from the State  School Fund under ORS
327.008 and 327.013 shall be reduced by $12,006,613; and
(c) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund
under ORS 327.008 and 327.019 shall be reduced by $12,006,613.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding and in lieu of the transfer required under ORS 343.243 (3),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the Department of Education shall transfer
$44,827,044 from the State School Fund to  the Special Education Account established under
ORS 343.247.
SECTION 8.
The amount of $4,000,000 is  transferred from the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 2